Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.070

Authority of secretary.

(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this chapter;

(b) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(c) Establish administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. Until July 1, 2016, for purposes of setting fees under this section, the secretary shall consider persons registered or certified under this chapter and health care assistants, certified under *chapter 18.135 RCW, as one profession;

(d) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter;

(e) Maintain the official department of health record of all applicants and credential holders; and

(f) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive registration or certification.

(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of a registration or certification, and the discipline of persons registered or certified under this chapter.

[ 2012 c 153 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 18.135 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 153 s 20.

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.